Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-105
Blaine.

The county of Blaine is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-one, range twenty-one, running thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, range twenty-one; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, range twenty-five; thence south to the southwest corner of township twenty-one, range twenty-five; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-one, range twenty-one, to the place of beginning.

Laws 1885, c. 31, § 1, p. 205;

R.S.1913, § 817;

C.S.1922, § 719;

C.S.1929, § 25-106;

R.S.1943, § 22-105.